Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2990.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 23 of Title 22, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A law enforcement officer shall be prohibited from wearing a
face covering that conceals or obscures the identity of the law
enforcement officer while interacting with the public in the
performance of his or her official duties.
B. A face covering shall not include any of the following:
1. A medical mask or surgical mask to protect against the
transmission of disease or infection or any other mask, helmet, or
Req. No. 15714 Page 1

devi ce including, but not limited to, an air-purifying respirator,
full-face mask or half-face mask, or self-contained breathing
apparatus necessary to protect against exposure to any toxin, gas,
smoke, inclement weather, or any other hazardous or harmful
environmental condition;
2. A mask, helmet, or device including, but not limited to, a
self-contained breathing apparatus necessary for underwater use;
3. A motorcycle helmet when worn by a law enforcement officer
utilizing a motorcycle or other vehicle that requires a helmet for
safe operation while in the performance of his or her official
duties; and
4. Eyewear necessary to protect a law enforcement officer from
the use of retinal weapons including, but not limited to, lasers.
C. The provisions of subsection A of this section shall not
apply to a law enforcement officer assigned to Special Weapons and
Tactics (SWAT) team units while actively performing his or her SWAT
responsibilities where a face covering is necessary to protect the
face of the law enforcement officer from physical harm, or a law
enforcement officer engaged in undercover duties in the regular
performance of his or her official duties.
D. A law enforcement officer shall visibly display
identification that includes the name of the law enforcement agency,
the name of the law enforcement officer, and the badge number of the
law enforcement officer when performing his or her official duties.
Req. No. 15714 Page 2

The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to a law
enforcement officer engaged in undercover duties in the regular
performance of his or her official duties.
E. Any law enforcement agency operating in the state of
Oklahoma shall develop a written policy regarding the identification
requirements provided for in subsection D of this section. The law
enforcement agency shall distribute the written policy to all law
enforcement officers of the agency and publicly post the written
policy at the law enforcement agency. The written policy shall
include, at a minimum, the following:
1. A requirement that all law enforcement officers visibly
display identification that includes the name of the law enforcement
agency, the name of the law enforcement officer, and the badge
number of the law enforcement officer when performing his or her
official duties; and
2. A narrowly tailored exception for limited undercover
assignments.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15714 GRS 01/03/26




Req. No. 15714 Page 3